ja: ドラムヘッド補強タイプ: 内蔵コントロールリング; センタードット (リバース); センタードット (トップ); エッジリング; なし; パワードット / オーバーサイズドット; その他
ru: Тип усиления барабанной кожи: Встроенное демпферное кольцо; Центральная точка (обратная); Центральная точка (сверху); Краевое кольцо; Нет; Точка Power dot / увеличенная точка; Другое
tr: Davul derisi güçlendirme türü: Dahili kontrol halkası; Orta nokta (ters); Orta nokta (üst); Kenar halkası; Yok; Güç noktası / büyük nokta; Diğer
ko: 드럼 헤드 보강 유형: 내장 컨트롤 링; 센터 도트 (리버스); 센터 도트 (상단); 엣지 링; 없음; 파워 도트/오버사이즈 도트; 기타
fr: Type de renfort de peau de batterie: Anneau de contrôle intégré; Point central (inversé); Point central (supérieur); Anneau de bordure; Aucun; Point de renfort / point surdimensionné; Autre
vi: Loại gia cố mặt trống: Vòng kiểm soát tích hợp; Điểm trung tâm (mặt dưới); Điểm trung tâm (mặt trên); Vòng viền; Không có; Điểm trợ lực / điểm cỡ lớn; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta ojačitve glave bobna: Vgrajen dušilni obroč; Sredinska pika (spodaj); Sredinska pika (zgoraj); Zunanji obroč; Brez; Ojačana pika/izjemno velika pika; Drugo
th: ประเภทการเสริมแรงหนังกลอง: วงแหวนควบคุมเสียงในตัว; จุดศูนย์กลาง (กลับด้าน); จุดศูนย์กลาง (บน); วงแหวนขอบ; ไม่มี; จุดเพิ่มพลังเสียง / จุดขนาดใหญ่; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ výstuže blany bubna: Zabudovaný kontrolný prstenec; Stredový bod (obrátený); Stredový bod (vrchný); Okrajový prstenec; Žiadne; Silový bod / nadrozmerný bod; Iné
fi: Rumpukalvon vahvistustyyppi: Sisäänrakennettu vaimennusrengas; Keskivahvike (alapuolella); Keskivahvike (päällä); Reunarengas; Ei mitään; Power dot / ylisuuri vahvike; Muu
da: Forstærkningsform til trommeskind: Indbygget kontrolring; Centrumpunkt (omvendt); Centrumpunkt (top); Kantring; Ingen; Power dot / overstørrelse punkt; Anden
bg-BG: Тип подсилване на мембраната за барабан: Вграден контролен пръстен; Централна точка (обратна); Централна точка (отгоре); Краен пръстен; Няма; Усилена точка / уголемена точка; Друго
en: Drum head reinforcement type: Built-in control ring; Center dot (reverse); Center dot (top); Edge ring; None; Power dot / oversized dot; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta ojačanja glave bubnja: Ugrađeni kontrolni prsten; Središnja točka (obrnuta); Središnja točka (gornja); Rubni prsten; Ništa; Power dot / povećana točka; Ostalo
hu: Dobfej-erősítés típusa: Beépített szabályozógyűrű; Középső pont (fordított); Középső pont (felső); Peremgyűrű; Nincs; Power dot / túlméretezett pont; Egyéb
zh-TW: 鼓皮加強類型: 內建控制環; 中心點 (反向); 中心點 (頂部); 邊緣環; 無; 加強點 / 加大點; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de reforço da pele do tambor: Anel de controle embutido; Círculo central (reverso); Círculo central (superior); Anel de borda; Nenhum; Power dot / círculo oversized; Outro
pt-PT: tipo de reforço da pele do tambor: Anel de controlo integrado; Ponto central (inverso); Ponto central (superior); Anel de rebordo; Nenhum; Power dot/ponto sobredimensionado; Outro
el: Τύπος ενίσχυσης κεφαλής τυμπάνου: Ενσωματωμένος δακτύλιος ελέγχου; Κεντρικό σημείο (ανάστροφο); Κεντρικό σημείο (επάνω); Δακτύλιος άκρου; Κανένα; Power dot / μεγάλο σημείο; Άλλο
de: Art der Trommelfellverstärkung: Integrierter Dämpfungsring; Center Dot (unterseitig); Center Dot (Oberseite); Randring; Keine; Power Dot / Oversized Dot; Sonstige
nb: Type forsterkning av trommeskinn: Innebygd kontrollring; Senterpunkt (omvendt); Senterpunkt (topp); Kantring; Ingen; Power-punkt / overdimensjonert punkt; Annet
pl: Typ wzmocnienia naciągu perkusyjnego: Wbudowany pierścień tłumiący; Centralna łatka (od spodu); Centralna łatka (od góry); Pierścień krawędziowy; Brak; Powiększona łatka tłumiąca; Inny
sv: Typ av förstärkning för trumskinn: Inbyggd dämpring; Mittpunkt (omvänd); Mittpunkt (översida); Kantring; Ingen; Kraftpunkt/överdimensionerad punkt; Övrigt
cs: Typ výztuhy hlavy bubnu: Vestavěný tlumicí kroužek; Středový bod (z rubu); Středový bod (z líce); Okrajový kroužek; Žádné; Zesílený bod / zvětšený bod; Ostatní
lt-LT: Būgno membranos sutvirtinimo tipas: Integruotas valdymo žiedas; Centrinis taškas (atvirkštinis); Centrinis taškas (viršutinis); Krašto žiedas; Nėra; Sustiprintas taškas / padidintas taškas; Kita
zh-CN: 鼓皮加强层类型: 内置控制圈; 中心点（反面）; 中心点（顶部）; 边缘圈; 无; 强力点/超大点; 其他
it: Tipo di rinforzo della testa del tamburo: Anello di controllo integrato; Dot centrale (inverso); Dot centrale (superiore); Anello sul bordo; Nessuno; Power dot / dot maggiorato; Altro
es: Tipo de refuerzo del parche del tambor: Anillo de control integrado; Punto central (inverso); Punto central (superior); Anillo de borde; Ninguno; Punto de potencia / punto extragrande; Otro
nl: Drumvel versteviging type: Ingebouwde dempring; Center-dot (omgekeerd); Center-dot (bovenkant); Randring; Geen; Power-dot / extra grote dot; Anders
ro-RO: Tip de întărire a membranei de tobă: Inel de control încorporat; Punct central (inversat); Punct central (partea superioară); Inel pe margine; Fără; Power dot / punct supradimensionat; Altele